Colorado, session 2026A, HB1310.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1239,
amend (2)(c); and add (1)(b.5), (1)(d), and (4)(c) as follows:
24-33.5-1239. Wildfire resilient homes grant program - fund
- rules - report - definitions - repeal.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(b.5) "INCOME QUALIFIED" MEANS A HOUSEHOLD INCOME AT OR
BELOW SEVENTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME, AS DETERMINED
BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT.
(d) "WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND"
MEANS THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 24-33-117 (1).
(2) (c) (I) In awarding grants pursuant to the program, the division
shall consider the location of the homeowner's property, whether the
property is a primary residence of the homeowner, the income or assets
from all sources of the homeowner, the type of improvement proposed by
the homeowner, and any other criteria established by the division
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The division may require
applicants to provide information on the applicant's income, and the
division may prioritize income levels of applicants in awarding grants.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, IN AWARDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO THE PROGRAM, THE
DIVISION SHALL PRIORITIZE HOMEOWNERS WHO ARE INCOME QUALIFIED OR
-2- HB26-1310

WHO LACK THE ABILITY TO PERFORM THE STRUCTURE HARDENING WORK
BECAUSE OF AGE, DISABILITY, OR ILLNESS.
(4) (c) (I) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT OF MONEY TO THE FUND
FROM THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND IN AN
AMOUNT THAT IS AT LEAST TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM
THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED
TO FUND GRANTS THROUGH THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY
DEVELOPMENT FUND IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27.
(II) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2028-29, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SHALL APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT OF MONEY TO THE FUND FROM THE
WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND IN AN AMOUNT
THAT IS AT LEAST THIRTY PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM THE
WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED TO
FUND GRANTS THROUGH THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY
DEVELOPMENT FUND IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28.
(III) IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2029-30 AND IN EACH STATE FISCAL
YEAR THEREAFTER, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL APPROPRIATE AN
AMOUNT OF MONEY TO THE FUND FROM THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION
CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS AT LEAST FIFTY
PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION
CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED TO FUND GRANTS THROUGH
THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND IN STATE
FISCAL YEAR 2028-29 OR THE APPLICABLE PRIOR STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(IV) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(c)(IV) AND SUBSECTIONS (4)(c)(I) AND
(4)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION ARE REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33-117, add (6.4)
-3- HB26-1310

as follows:
24-33-117. Wildfire mitigation capacity development fund -
established - financing - legislative intent - repeal.
(6.4) (a) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28, FOR THE PURPOSE OF
FUNDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SHALL APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT OF MONEY TO THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION
CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS NO MORE THAN NINETY PERCENT
OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY
DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED TO FUND GRANTS IN STATE FISCAL
YEAR 2026-27.
(b) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2028-29, FOR THE PURPOSE OF
FUNDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SHALL APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT OF MONEY TO THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION
CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS NO MORE THAN SEVENTY PERCENT
OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY
DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED TO FUND GRANTS IN STATE FISCAL
YEAR 2027-28.
(c) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2029-30 AND IN EACH STATE FISCAL
YEAR THEREAFTER, FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT
OF MONEY TO THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND
THAT IS NO MORE THAN FIFTY PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY FROM
THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION CAPACITY DEVELOPMENT FUND THAT IS USED
TO FUND GRANTS IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2028-29 OR THE APPLICABLE
PRIOR STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(d) THIS SUBSECTION (6.4)(d) AND SUBSECTIONS (6.4)(a) AND
(6.4)(b) OF THIS SECTION ARE REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
-4- HB26-1310

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1310